Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.290

Duty to enforce.

It shall be the duty of all state and county law enforcement officers and all employees and agents of the department to aid in the enforcement of this chapter.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.28.290. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 30; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-39.]